en: Bow stick material: Brazilwood; Carbon fiber; Composite; Fiberglass; Pernambuco; Wood (unspecified); Other
zh-TW: 弓桿材質: 巴西木; 碳纖維; 複合材質; 玻璃纖維; 伯南布哥木; 木材 (未指定); 其他
es: Material de la vara del arco: Palo de Brasil; Fibra de carbono; Compuesto; Fibra de vidrio; Pernambuco; Madera (no especificada); Otro
sk-SK: Materiál prútu sláčika: Brazílske drevo; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Pernambuk; Drevo (nešpecifikované); Iné
sl-SI: Material palice loka: Brazilski les; Ogljikova vlakna; Kompozit; Steklena vlakna; Pernambuk; Les (nedoločeno); Drugo
it: Materiale dell'archetto: Legno del Brasile; Fibra di carbonio; Composito; Fibra di vetro; Pernambuco; Legno (non specificato); Altro
hr-HR: Materijal štapa gudala: Brazilsko drvo; Karbonska vlakna; Kompozit; Stakloplastika; Pernambuco drvo; Drvo (neodređeno); Ostalo
el: Υλικό ράβδου τόξου: Ξύλο Βραζιλίας; Ανθρακόνημα; Σύνθετο υλικό; Fiberglass; Περναμπούκο; Ξύλο (μη καθορισμένο); Άλλο
ko: 활대 소재: 브라질우드; 탄소 섬유; 복합 소재; 파이버글라스; 페르남부쿠; 목재(미지정); 기타
zh-CN: 弓杆材质: 巴西木; 碳纤维; 复合材料; 玻璃纤维; 伯南布哥木; 木质（未说明）; 其他
th: วัสดุของด้ามคันธนู: ไม้บราซิล; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; คอมโพสิต; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; ไม้เปร์นัมบูโก; ไม้ (ไม่ระบุประเภท); อื่นๆ
nb: Materiale i buepinne: Brasiltre; Karbonfiber; Kompositt; Glassfiber; Pernambuco-tre; Tre (uspesifisert); Annet
vi: Chất liệu thân cây vĩ: Gỗ Brazil; Sợi carbon; Composite; Sợi thủy tinh; Gỗ Pernambuco; Gỗ (không xác định); Khác
fr: Matériau de la barre d'étrave: Bois de Brésil; Fibre de carbone; Composite; Fibre de verre; Pernambouc; Bois (non spécifié); Autre
lt-LT: Lanko lazdos medžiaga: Brazilmedis; Anglies pluoštas; Kompozitas; Stiklo pluoštas; Pernambukas; Mediena (nenurodyta); Kita
de: Material des Bogenstocks: Brasilholz; Carbonfaser; Verbundmaterial; Glasfaser; Fernambukholz; Holz (nicht spezifiziert); Sonstige
pl: Materiał łęczyska łuku: Brezylka (brazilwood); Włókno węglowe; Kompozyt; Włókno szklane; Fernambuk; Drewno (nieokreślone); Inne
sv: Bågpinnens material: Bresiljeträ; Kolfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Fernambuk; Trä (ospecificerat); Annat
da: Buepindsmateriale: Brasiltræ; Kulfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Pernambuco; Træ (uspecificeret); Andet
cs: Materiál příčníku: Brazilské dřevo; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Fernambuk; Dřevo (nespecifikované); Jiné
fi: Jousen kepin materiaali: Bresiljapuu; Hiilikuitu; Komposiitti; Lasikuitu; Pernambuco; Puu (määrittelemätön); Muu
tr: Yay çubuğu malzemesi: Brezilya ağacı; Karbon fiber; Kompozit; Cam elyafı; Pernambuco; Ahşap (belirtilmemiş); Diğer
pt-PT: Material da haste do arco: Pau-brasil; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Pau-brasil (Pernambuco); Madeira (não especificada); Outro
nl: Materiaal boogstok: Brazielhout; Koolstofvezel; Composiet; Glasvezel; Pernambuco-hout; Hout (ongespecificeerd); Overige
pt-BR: Material da haste da proa: Pau-brasil; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Pernambuco; Madeira (não especificada); Outros
ja: ボウスティック素材: ブラジルウッド; カーボンファイバー; コンポジット; グラスファイバー; フェルナンブーコ; 木材（未指定）; その他
ru: Материал древка лука: Бразильское дерево; Углеволокно; Композит; Стекловолокно; Фернамбук; Дерево (не указано); Другое
bg-BG: Материал на тялото на лъка: Бразилско дърво; Въглеродни влакна; Композитен материал; Фибростъкло; Пернамбуко; Дърво (неуточнено); Друго
ro-RO: Materialul baghetei arcușului: Lemn de Brazilia; Fibră de carbon; Compozit; Fibră de sticlă; Pernambuco; Lemn (nespecificat); Altele
hu: Vonószár anyaga: Brazilfa; Szénszálas; Kompozit; Üvegszálas; Fernambukfa; Fa (nincs megadva); Egyéb